District of Columbia statutes.
38-3004

Commission bylaws to be filed with Mayor.

Pursuant to Article III(i) of the Compact, the Commission shall file a copy of the Commission’s bylaws and amendments to the bylaws with the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-65, § 5, 31 DCR 198
1981 Ed., § 31-2304.